Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.300

Quieting title against outlawed mortgage or deed of trust.

The record owner of real estate may maintain an action to quiet title against the lien of a mortgage or deed of trust on the real estate where an action to foreclose such mortgage or deed of trust would be barred by the statute of limitations, and, upon proof sufficient to satisfy the court, may have judgment quieting title against such a lien.

[ 1998 c 295 s 17; 1937 c 124 s 1; RRS s 785-1.]

NOTES:

Limitation of actions, generally: Chapter 4.16 RCW.

Real estate mortgages, foreclosure: Chapter 61.12 RCW.